Utah statutes.
76-10-500.   Uniform law.

(1)  The individual right to keep and bear arms being a constitutionally protected right, the Legislature finds the need to provide uniform laws throughout the state.  Except as specifically provided by state law, a citizen of the United States or a lawfully admitted alien shall not be:

(a)  prohibited from owning, possessing, purchasing, selling, transferring, transporting, or keeping any firearm at his place of residence, property, business, or in any vehicle lawfully in his possession or lawfully under his control; or

(b)  required to have a permit or license to purchase, own, possess, transport, or keep a firearm.

(2)  This part is uniformly applicable throughout this state and in all its political subdivisions and municipalities.   All authority to regulate  firearms shall be reserved to the state except where the Legislature specifically delegates responsibility to local authorities or state entities.  Unless specifically authorized by the Legislature by statute, a local authority or state entity may not enact or enforce any ordinance, regulation, or rule pertaining to firearms.

